it: Formato dei contenuti di proiezione del planetario: Campo stellare rotante integrato; Campo stellare statico integrato; Libreria di contenuti digitali (app/dispositivo); Misto (dischi + effetti integrati); Dischi/cartucce di proiezione; Pellicola per diapositive; Altro
ru: Формат проекционного контента планетария: Встроенное вращающееся звездное поле; Встроенное статичное звездное поле; Библиотека цифрового контента (приложение/устройство); Смешанный (диски + встроенные эффекты); Проекционные диски/картриджи; Слайд-пленка; Другое
hr-HR: Planetarijska projekcija Sadržaj format: Ugrađeno rotirajuće zvjezdano polje; Ugrađeno statično zvjezdano polje; Digitalna biblioteka sadržaja (aplikacija/uređaj); Kombinirano (diskovi i ugrađeni efekti); Projekcijski diskovi/ulošci; Dijapozitivi; Ostalo
es: Formato de contenido de proyección del planetario: Campo de estrellas giratorio incorporado; Campo de estrellas estático incorporado; Biblioteca de contenido digital (aplicación/dispositivo); Mixto (discos + efectos incorporados); Discos/cartuchos de proyección; Película de diapositivas; Otro
nb: Planetariumprojeksjon – innholdsformat: Innebygd roterende stjernefelt; Innebygd statisk stjernefelt; Digitalt innholdsbibliotek (app/enhet); Blandet (plater + innebygde effekter); Projeksjonsplater/-kassetter; Lysbildefilm; Annet
th: รูปแบบเนื้อหาการฉายภาพท้องฟ้าจำลอง: ฉากดาวหมุนในตัว; ฉากดาวคงที่ในตัว; คลังเนื้อหาดิจิทัล (แอป/อุปกรณ์); ผสม (แผ่นดิสก์ + เอฟเฟกต์ในตัว); แผ่นดิสก์/ตลับฉาย; ฟิล์มสไลด์; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 星空投影機投影內容格式: 內建旋轉星空; 內建靜態星空; 數位內容庫 (應用程式/裝置); 混合 (光碟 + 內建特效); 投影光碟/卡匣; 幻燈片; 其他
sl-SI: Format projekcijske vsebine planetarija: Vgrajeno vrtljivo zvezdno polje; Vgrajeno statično zvezdno polje; Digitalna knjižnica vsebin (aplikacija/naprava); Mešano (diski in vgrajeni učinki); Projekcijski diski/kartuše; Dianapozitiv; Drugo
bg-BG: Формат на съдържанието за прожекция в планетариум: Вградено въртящо се звездно поле; Вградено статично звездно поле; Библиотека с дигитално съдържание (приложение/устройство); Смесено (дискове + вградени ефекти); Прожекционни дискове/касети; Диапозитив; Друго
pt-PT: Projeção planetária Formato Conteúdo: Campo estelar rotativo incorporado; Campo estelar estático incorporado; Biblioteca de conteúdos digitais (app/dispositivo); Misto (discos e efeitos incorporados); Discos/cartuchos de projeção; Película de diapositivo; Outro
hu: Planetárium-vetítés tartalmának formátuma: Beépített forgó csillagmező; Beépített statikus csillagmező; Digitális tartalomkönyvtár (alkalmazás/eszköz); Vegyes (korongok és beépített effektek); Vetítőkorongok/kazetták; Diafilm; Egyéb
en: Planetarium projection content format: Built-in rotating star field; Built-in static star field; Digital content library (app/device); Mixed (discs + built-in effects); Projection discs/cartridges; Slide film; Other
tr: Planetaryum projeksiyon içerik formatı: Dahili dönen yıldız alanı; Dahili sabit yıldız alanı; Dijital içerik kitaplığı (uygulama/cihaz); Karışık (diskler + dahili efektler); Projeksiyon diskleri/kartuşları; Slayt film; Diğer
nl: Planetarium projectiecontent formaat: Ingebouwd roterend sterrenveld; Ingebouwd statisch sterrenveld; Digitale contentbibliotheek (app/apparaat); Gemengd (schijven + ingebouwde effecten); Projectieschijven/cartridges; Diafilm; Overig
ro-RO: Formatul conținutului de proiecție al planetariului: Câmp stelar rotativ încorporat; Câmp stelar static încorporat; Bibliotecă de conținut digital (aplicație/dispozitiv); Mixt (discuri + efecte încorporate); Discuri/cartușe de proiecție; Film cu diapozitive; Altele
pt-BR: Planetário projeção conteúdo formato: Campo estelar rotativo integrado; Campo estelar estático integrado; Biblioteca de conteúdo digital (app/dispositivo); Misto (discos + efeitos integrados); Discos/cartuchos de projeção; Filme de slide; Outro
zh-CN: 天文馆投影内容格式: 内置旋转星空; 内置静态星空; 数字内容库（应用/设备）; 混合（投影盘 + 内置效果）; 投影盘/投影匣; 幻灯片; 其他
cs: Formát obsahu projekce planetária: Vestavěné rotující hvězdné pole; Vestavěné statické hvězdné pole; Knihovna digitálního obsahu (aplikace/zařízení); Smíšené (disky + vestavěné efekty); Projekční disky / kazety; Diapozitiv; Jiné
ko: 플라네타륨 투영 콘텐츠 형식: 내장형 회전 스타 필드; 내장형 고정 스타 필드; 디지털 콘텐츠 라이브러리(앱/기기); 혼합(디스크 + 내장 효과); 프로젝션 디스크/카트리지; 슬라이드 필름; 기타
fr: Format du contenu de projection du planétarium: Champ d’étoiles rotatif intégré; Champ d’étoiles statique intégré; Bibliothèque de contenu numérique (application/appareil); Mixte (disques et effets intégrés); Disques/cartouches de projection; Film diapositive; Autre
lt-LT: Planetariumo projekcijos turinio formatas: Įmontuotas besisukantis žvaigždžių laukas; Įmontuotas statinis žvaigždžių laukas; Skaitmeninio turinio biblioteka (programėlė / įrenginys); Mišrus (diskai + įmontuoti efektai); Projekcijos diskai / kasetės; Skaidrių juosta; Kita
sv: Innehållsformat för planetariumprojektion: Inbyggt roterande stjärnfält; Inbyggt statiskt stjärnfält; Digitalt innehållsbibliotek (app/enhet); Blandat (skivor + inbyggda effekter); Projektionsskivor/-kassetter; Bildspelsfilm; Övrigt
ja: プラネタリウム投影コンテンツ形式: 内蔵回転星野; 内蔵静的星野; デジタルコンテンツライブラリ (アプリ/デバイス); ミックス (ディスク + 内蔵エフェクト); 投影ディスク/カートリッジ; スライドフィルム; その他
da: Format for planetarieprojektionsindhold: Indbygget roterende stjernehimmel; Indbygget statisk stjernehimmel; Digitalt indholdsbibliotek (app/enhed); Blandet (skiver og indbyggede effekter); Projektionsskiver/-patroner; Diasfilm; Andet
fi: Planetaarioprojektorin sisältöformaatti: Sisäänrakennettu pyörivä tähtitaivas; Sisäänrakennettu staattinen tähtitaivas; Digitaalinen sisältökirjasto (sovellus/laite); Sekoitettu (levyt ja sisäänrakennetut tehosteet); Projisointilevyt/-kasetit; Diafilmi; Muu
el: Τύπος περιεχομένου προβολής πλανητάριου: Ενσωματωμένο περιστρεφόμενο πεδίο αστεριών; Ενσωματωμένο στατικό πεδίο αστεριών; Βιβλιοθήκη ψηφιακού περιεχομένου (εφαρμογή/συσκευή); Μικτό (δίσκοι + ενσωματωμένα εφέ); Δίσκοι/κασέτες προβολής; Φιλμ σλάιντ; Άλλο
sk-SK: Formát obsahu projekcie planetária: Zabudované rotujúce hviezdne pole; Zabudované statické hviezdne pole; Knižnica digitálneho obsahu (aplikácia/zariadenie); Zmiešané (disky + zabudované efekty); Projekčné disky/kazety; Diapozitívny film; Iné
pl: Format treści projekcji planetarium: Wbudowane obracające się pole gwiazd; Wbudowane statyczne pole gwiazd; Biblioteka treści cyfrowych (aplikacja/urządzenie); Mieszane (dyski + wbudowane efekty); Dyski/kasety z projekcjami; Klajsza do slajdów; Inny
de: Inhaltsformat der Planetariumsprojektion: Integriertes rotierendes Sternenfeld; Integriertes statisches Sternenfeld; Digitale Inhaltsbibliothek (App/Gerät); Gemischt (Scheiben + integrierte Effekte); Projektionsscheiben/-kassetten; Diafilm; Sonstige
vi: Định dạng nội dung trình chiếu tại cung thiên văn: Vùng sao xoay tích hợp; Vùng sao tĩnh tích hợp; Thư viện nội dung kỹ thuật số (ứng dụng/thiết bị); Hỗn hợp (đĩa + hiệu ứng tích hợp); Đĩa/hộp chiếu; Phim trượt; Khác